dictsource/ps_rules
// This ps_rules file is created by Hanif Rahman for Pashto language support in espeak-ng
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Phoneme rules for Pashto
// Updated May 2025: Comprehensive revision to ensure full alignment with ph_pashto phoneme definitions
// Improved context-sensitive rules and expanded coverage of phoneme combinations
// Previous updates:
// - April 2025: Comprehensive overhaul with improved context-sensitive rules, stress patterns, 
// - March 2025: Fixed to use only defined phonemes with correct notation

// Letter group - l01: Vowels

.replace
٠	0
١	1
٢	2
٣	3
٤	4
٥	5
٦	6
٧	7
٨	8
٩	9
ي	ی
آ	ا

// vowel signs, alif acts as consonants at start of word if these follow
.L01  َ ِ ُ و ی ع ا ې ۍ ی ګ ڼ ړ ډ ټ څ ځ ښ ږ ٰ ٗ

// Consonants
.L02  ب پ ت ټ ث ج ځ چ څ ح خ د ډ ذ ر ړ ز ژ ږ س ش ښ ص ض ط ظ غ ف ق ک ګ ل م ن ڼ ه ئ

// Letter group - L03 (all letters)
.L03  ا ب پ ت ټ ث ج ځ چ څ ح خ د ډ ذ ر ړ ز ژ ږ س ش ښ ص ض ط ظ ع غ ف ق ک ګ ل م ن ڼ و ې ۍ ی ه ئ ٰ

// Common word endings
.L04  ان ات ون ین 

// Consonant clusters
.L05  بل پل تر ټر در ډر سر شت ښت کر ګر مر نر ڼر

// Short vowel contexts
.L06  َت َد َر َس َش َک َل َم َن

// Long vowel contexts
.L07  اب ات اد ار ال ام ان او ای ېر ېز ېږ ېښ

// VOWELS

.group َ
	َ	a
	َی 	e
	َې	e
	َو 	wa
	َع	a:
	_) َ	'a      // Stress on initial short vowel
	L02) َ (L02L02_	a#     // Using unstressed vowel variant in final closed syllables
	L02) َ (L02_	a      // Maintained in final open syllables
	L02) َ (L05	'a      // Stress before consonant clusters

.group ِ
	ِ	i
	ِی	i:
	ِع(L02	i
	L03L03) ِ (_S1	'e:
	_) ِ	'i      // Stress on initial short vowel
	L02) ِ (L02L02_	i#     // Using unstressed vowel variant in final closed syllables
	L02) ِ (L02_	i      // Maintained in final open syllables
	L02) ِ (L05	'i      // Stress before consonant clusters

.group ُ
	ُ	u
	ُو	u:
	ُع	o
	_) ُ	'u      // Stress on initial short vowel
	L02) ُ (L02L02_	u#     // Using unstressed vowel variant in final closed syllables
	L02) ُ (L02_	u      // Maintained in final open syllables
	L02) ُ (L05	'u      // Stress before consonant clusters

.group ٗ
	ٗ	u:
	_) ٗ	'u:     // Stress on initial long vowel
	L02) ٗ	u:      // Long vowel in medial position

.group ھ
	ھ	h 
	ھ (_	h
        ھ (l01	h
        ھ (L02	h@      // Add schwa when followed by consonant

.group ٰ
	ٰ	a:
	ٰی	a:
	_) ٰ	'a:     // Stress on initial long vowel
	L02) ٰ	a:      // Long vowel in medial position

.group ا
	ا	a:
	_) ا (L01   // Acts like Consonants if followed by a vowel but is silent.
        _) ا	'a      // Initial alif with stress
        _) الله	'a:l.la:h // Allah
        _) اور	'o:r     // Fire (initial a with stress)
        _) اوس	'o:ws     // Now (initial a with stress)
        _) اوږد	'awZ.d   // Long (initial a with stress)
        _) او	'aw     // Initial aw diphthong
        _) اوبه	'awb@    // Water (aw diphthong)
        _) اوښ	'o:S.    // Camel (aw diphthong)
        _) اوړی	'o:r.@j  // Summer (aw diphthong)
        _) ای	'e     // Initial ay diphthong with stress
        _) ایښودل	'i:S.od@l // To put/place (ay diphthong)
        _) ایمان	'i:ma:n  // Faith (ay diphthong)
        _) ایره	'i:r@    // Ash (ay diphthong)
        _) ایله	'i:l@    // Hardly/just (ay diphthong)
        ائ(L02	'aj     // ay diphthong with stress
        اه(_	a:h     // Final alif+he
        _) اهل	a:h@l    // People/inhabitants
        _) اهم	a:h@m    // Important
        L03L03) ات (_S2	a:t    // Common ending
        _) اتل	a:t@l    // Hero
        _) اتڼ	a:t@n.   // Folk dance
        ائ(L02	a@i      
        اٖ	i       // Alif with inverted kasra
        _) ابتدا	ibti'da: // Beginning (alif with kasra)
        _) اخلاص	ix'la:s  // Sincerity (alif with kasra)
        _) اسلام	is'la:m  // Islam (alif with kasra)
        اں	a:n     // Alif with noon ghunna
        ا (ن	a:n     // Alif before noon
        _) انسان	in'sa:n  // Human (alif with kasra before noon)
        _) انځور	@n'dzwr  // Picture (alif with schwa before noon)
        _) امتحان	imti'ha:n // Exam (alif with kasra)
        _) انار	a'na:r   // Pomegranate (alif with fatha)
        ا (ں	a:n     // Alif before noon ghunna
        L02) ا (L02	a:      // Medial alif between consonants
        L02) ا (_	a      // Final alif after consonant (shorter)
        L02L02) ا (_	'a     // Final alif after consonant cluster (stressed)
        // Additional common words starting with alif
        _) اچار	a'tSa:r  // Pickle
        _) ادب	a'dab    // Literature
        _) افغان	af'Qa:n  // Afghan
        _) ارزښت	ar'z@S.t // Value
        _) اړتیا	ar.'tja: // Need/necessity
        _) استاد	us'ta:d  // Teacher (alif with damma/u)
        _) اونۍ	'u:n@i   // Week

.group ب
	ب	b
	ب (_	b
	_) ب (َ	b@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ب (ِ	b@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ب (ُ	b@      // Initial with damma
	ب (L02L02	b@      // Before consonant cluster
	ب (ب	b:      // Geminated
	_) بادام	ba:'da:m  // Almond
	_) باران	ba:'ra:n  // Rain
	_) باغ	ba:Q      // Garden
	_) بازار	ba:'za:r  // Market
	_) باز	ba:z      // Falcon
	_) بام	ba:m      // Roof
	_) باور	ba:'w@r   // Belief
	_) بچه	ba'tS@    // Child
	_) بدل	ba'd@l    // Change
	_) بس	bas       // Enough/bus
	_) بل	b@l       // Another
	_) بلبل	b@l'b@l   // Nightingale
	_) بند	band      // Closed

.group پ
	پ	p
	پ (_	p
	پھ	p
	_) پ (َ	p@      // Initial with fatha
	_) پ (ِ	p@      // Initial with kasra
	_) پ (ُ	p@      // Initial with damma
	پ (L02L02	p@      // Before consonant cluster
	پ (پ	p:      // Geminated
	_) پلار	p@'la:r  // Father
	_) پښتو	p@S'to   // Pashto language
	_) پاڼه	pa:'n.@  // Page/leaf
	_) پوهه	po:'h@   // Knowledge
	_) پیاز	pja:z    // Onion
	_) پټ	p@t.     // Hidden
	_) پوښتنه	poS't@n@ // Question
	_) پیسه	paj's@   // Money
	_) پل	p@l      // Bridge
	_) پاک	pa:k     // Clean/pure

.group ت
	ت	t
	ت (_	t
	تھ	t
	ت (ان	ta:n    // Common suffix
	ت (ا	ta:     // Common sequence
	_) ت (َ	t@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ت (ِ	t@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ت (ُ	t@      // Initial with damma
	ت (L02L02	t@      // Before consonant cluster
	ت (ت	t:      // Geminated
	ت (و	tw      // Before waw
	_) تاج	ta:dZ    // Crown
	_) تاریخ	ta:'ri:x  // History/date
	_) تازه	'ta:z@   // Fresh
	_) تبه	'tab@    // Fever
	_) تخت	taxt     // Throne/bed
	_) تړون	ta'r.@n  // Agreement/contract
	_) تل	t@l      // Always
	_) توره	'to:r@   // Sword
	_) تور	tor      // Black
	_) تیز	tez      // Sharp/fast

.group ټ
	ټ	t.
	ټ (_	t.
	ټھ	t.
	_) ټ (َ	t.@     // Initial with fatha
	_) ټ (ِ	t.@     // Initial with kasra
	_) ټ (ُ	t.@     // Initial with damma
	ټ (L02L02	t.@     // Before consonant cluster
	ټ (ټ	t.:     // Geminated
	_) ټوپ	t.op     // Jump
	_) ټال	t.a:l    // Postpone
	_) ټیټ	t.it.    // Low/short
	_) ټوکه	t.o:'k@  // Joke
	_) ټولنه	t.ol'n@  // Society
	_) ټک	t.@k     // Knock/tap
	_) ټانک	t.a:nk   // Tank
	_) ټاپو	t.a:'pu  // Island
	_) ټینګ	t.iN     // Firm/tight
	_) ټکی	t.@'ki   // Dot/point

.group ث
	ث	s
	ث (_	s
	ث (ث	s:      // Geminated
	_) ث (َ	s@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ث (ِ	s@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ث (ُ	s@      // Initial with damma
	_) ثابت	sa:'bit   // Stable/fixed
	_) ثواب	sa'wa:b   // Reward/virtue
	_) ثروت	sar'wat   // Wealth
	_) ثقیل	sa'qi:l   // Heavy
	_) ثمر	sa'mar    // Fruit/result
	_) ثانیه	sa:'nij@  // Second (time)
	_) ثلث	suls      // One-third
	_) ثقافت	saqa:'fat // Culture

.group ج
	ج	dZ      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ج (_	dZ      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	جھ	dZ      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ج (َ	dZ@     // Initial with fatha
	_) ج (ِ	dZ@     // Initial with kasra
	_) ج (ُ	dZ@     // Initial with damma
	ج (L02L02	dZ@     // Before consonant cluster
	ج (ج	dZ:     // Geminated
	_) جنګ	dZ@nQ    // War
	_) جوړ	dZor.    // Made/built
	_) جومات	dZo:'ma:t // Mosque
	_) جهان	dZa'ha:n // World
	_) جلا	dZa'la:  // Separate
	_) جنوب	dZa'nu:b // South
	_) جرګه	dZir'g@ // Assembly/council
	_) جادو	dZa:'du  // Magic
	_) جواب	dZa'wa:b // Answer
	_) جیب	dZeb     // Pocket

.group ځ
	ځ	dz
	ځ (_	dz
	_) ځ (َ	dz@     // Initial with fatha
	_) ځ (ِ	dz@     // Initial with kasra
	_) ځ (ُ	dz@     // Initial with damma
	ځ (L02L02	dz@     // Before consonant cluster
	ځ (ځ	dz:     // Geminated
	_) ځان	dza:n    // Self
	_) ځای	dza:j    // Place
	_) ځنګل	dz@ng@l  // Forest
	_) ځمکه	dz@m'k@  // Earth/land
	_) ځواک	dzwa:k   // Power/strength
	_) ځوان	dzwa:n   // Young
	_) ځنځیر	dz@n'dzi:r // Chain
	_) ځلا	dza'la:  // Shine/glitter
	_) ځنډ	dz@nd.   // Delay
	_) ځغلول	dz@Q'l@l // To run
	_) ځواب	dzwa:b   // Answer
	_) ځیر	dzi:r    // Attentive/careful
	_) ځیږ	dzi:Z.   // Rough/coarse
	_) ځپل	dz@p@l   // To suppress
	_) ځړول	dz@r.'w@l // To hang
	_) ځلیدل	dz@'li:d@l // To shine
	_) ځګ	dz@g     // Sand
	_) ځوړند	dzor.'@nd // Hanging
	_) ځیرک	dzi:'r@k  // Intelligent
	_) ځینې	dzi:'ne   // Some

.group چ
	چ	tS      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	چ (_	tS      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	چھ	tS      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) چ (َ	tS@     // Initial with fatha
	_) چ (ِ	tS@     // Initial with kasra
	_) چ (ُ	tS@     // Initial with damma
	چ (L02L02	tS@     // Before consonant cluster
	چ (چ	tS:     // Geminated
	_) چا	tSa:     // Who
	_) چت	tS@t     // Ceiling
	_) چمن	tS@'m@n  // Lawn/garden
	_) چټک	tS@'t.@k  // Fast/quick
	_) چاړه	tSa:'r.@  // Knife
	_) چوکۍ	tSo:'ki:  // Chair
	_) چل	tS@l     // Trick
	_) چپ	tS@p     // Quiet/silent
	_) چغه	tS@'Q@   // Shout/scream
	_) چکر	tS@'k@r  // Walk/stroll
	_) چینه	tSi:'n@  // Spring/fountain
	_) چیرې	tSi:'re  // Where
	_) چیغه	tSi:'Q@  // Scream
	_) چورلکه	tSor'l@k@ // Helicopter
	_) چوپړ	tSo'p@r.  // Service
	_) چاپ	tSa:p    // Print

.group څ
	څ	ts
	څ (_	ts
	_) څ (َ	ts@     // Initial with fatha
	_) څ (ِ	ts@     // Initial with kasra
	_) څ (ُ	ts@     // Initial with damma
	څ (L02L02	ts@     // Before consonant cluster
	څ (څ	ts:     // Geminated
	_) څوک	tsok    // Who
	_) څنګه	ts@'ng@  // How
	_) څلور	ts@'lor  // Four
	_) څپه	ts@'p@   // Wave
	_) څارنه	tsa:'r@n@ // Supervision
	_) څیړنه	tsi:'r.@n@ // Research
	_) څانګه	tsa:'ng@  // Branch
	_) څټ	ts@t.    // Back (of head)
	_) څرګند	ts@r'g@nd // Clear/evident
	_) څمڅه	ts@m'ts@  // Ladle
	_) څیره	tsi:'r@   // Face
	_) څرمن	ts@r'm@n  // Leather/skin
	_) څکول	ts@'kw@l  // To drink
	_) څنډه	ts@n'd.@  // Edge/border
	_) څوکه	tso:'k@   // Peak/summit
	_) څاڅکی	tsa:'ts@ki // Drop

.group ح
	ح	h
	ح (_	h
	_) ح (َ	h@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ح (ِ	h@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ح (ُ	h@      // Initial with damma
	ح (L02L02	h@      // Before consonant cluster
	ح (ح	h:      // Geminated
	_) حق	h@q     // Right/truth
	_) حال	ha:l    // Condition/state
	_) حکم	h@'k@m  // Order/command
	_) حمله	h@m'l@  // Attack
	_) حساب	hi'sa:b // Calculation/account
	_) حکومت	h@ku:'m@t // Government
	_) حرکت	h@r@'k@t // Movement
	_) حیران	haj'ra:n // Surprised
	_) حوصله	ho:'s@l@ // Patience
	_) حافظ	ha:'fiz // Guardian/protector
	_) حلال	h@'la:l // Permissible
	_) حرام	h@'ra:m // Forbidden
	_) حج	h@dZ    // Pilgrimage
	_) حاضر	ha:'zir // Present/ready
	_) حقیقت	h@qi:'q@t // Truth/reality

.group خ
	خ	X       // Updated to match ph_pashto
	خ (_	X       // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) خ (َ	X@      // Initial with fatha
	_) خ (ِ	X@      // Initial with kasra
	_) خ (ُ	X@      // Initial with damma
	خ (L02L02	X@      // Before consonant cluster
	خ (خ	X:      // Geminated
	_) خبر	X@'b@r   // News
	_) خوب	Xob     // Sleep/dream
	_) خوږ	XwaZ    // Sweet
	_) خاص	Xa:s    // Special
	_) خلک	X@l@k   // People
	_) خوله	Xo:'l@  // Mouth
	_) خپل	X@'p@l  // Own/self
	_) خدای	X@'daj  // God
	_) خاورې	Xa:'wre // Earth/soil
	_) خوشحال	XoS'ha:l // Happy
	_) خیال	Xi'ja:l // Thought
	_) خطر	Xa'tar  // Danger
	_) خوراک	Xo'ra:k // Food
	_) خوشې	Xo'Se   // Free/released
	_) خړ	X@r.    // Gray
